lex.m2m.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
  {ao}  {aoe}  {aoØe}  {aä}  {aØ}  {aØe}  {C}  {dlnrtØ}  {eiØ}  {eØ}  {ie}
  {i}  {ij}  {iØ}  {kg}  {kj}  {kv}  {kØ}  {kØ'}  {nlrs}  {nt}  {oö}
  {pm}  {pv}  {pØ}  {td}  {tds}  {tl}  {tls}  {tn}  {tns}  {tr}  {trs}  {tØ}
  {uy}  {uØ}  {V}  {VØ}  {yØ}  {äØ}  {äØe}  {Øt} 
  /v  lä-hte/v  kä-y/v  haravo-i/v  vali-tse/v  juo-kse/v  nä-ke/v
  ale-ne/v  sala-V/v  katke-A/v  selvi-A/v  koho-A/v  halu-A/v
  pala-V/v  kih-ise/v  öl-ise/v  rake-ntA/v
  +INF1

Definitions
  Vow = [a | e | i | o | u | y | ä | ö] ;
  VowEnd = [o | u | y | ö | %{aoe%}] ;
  VowEndØ = [%{aØe%} | %{eØ%} | %{iØ%} | %{äØe%} | %{eiØ%} | %{iØ%} | %{äØe%}] ;
  Cons = [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z] ;
  ConsGrad =  [(l|r|n) k %{kØ%} | (l|r) %{kØ%} | n %{kg%} | m %{pm%} | (l|r) %{pv%} | (l|r|m) p %{pØ%} | (h) %{td%} | l %{tl%} | n %{tn%} | r %{tr%} | (l|r|n) t %{tØ%}] ;
  ConsGradts = [ l %{tls%} | n %{tns%} | r %{trs%}] ;

!  %{aoØe%} | -- kaihti, laitti, taitti - NS V10 sallii, tässä ei

LEXICON Root
<Cons* Vow+ (Cons+ Vow+)* [Cons* | ConsGrad] VowEnd> /v ; ! V01,09-10
<Cons* Vow+ (Cons+ Vow+)* [Cons+ | ConsGrad] [%{aØe%} | %{äØe%}]> /v ; ! V02-04
<Cons* Vow+ (Cons+ Vow+)* ConsGradts [%{aØe%} | %{äØe%}]> /v ;! V05-08
<Cons [a|i|a a|a i] [Cons+ | ConsGrad] %{aoØe%}> /v ; ! V11 paistaa
<Cons a a r %{trs%} %{aoØe%}> /v ; ! V12 saartaa
<(Cons) Vow+ [Cons+ | ConsGrad] %{eiØ%}> /v ; ! V13 laskea
tun{tn}{eiØ} /v ; ! V14
po{td}{eiØ} /v ; ! V15
lä lä-hte/v ; ! V16
<Cons* Vow+ (Cons+ Vow+) [Cons+ | ConsGrad] %{iØ%}> /v ; ! V17 sallia
<Cons* Vow+ (Cons+ Vow+)* Cons+ [a|o|u|ö] %{iØ%}> /v ; ! V18 naida, uida, voida
sa{VØ} /v ; ! V19
jä{VØ} /v ; ! V19
my{VØ} /v ; ! V20
<Cons [%{uØ%} o | %{yØ%} ö] > /v ; ! V21
v{iØ}e /v ; ! V22
kä kä-y/v ; ! V23
<Cons* Vow+ Cons* (a|ä) i s %{eØ%}> /v ; ! V24 nuolaista
ran{kg}ais{eØ} /v ; ! V24
kus%{eØ%} /v ; ! V24
nous%{eØ%} /v ; ! V24
les%{eØ%} /v ; ! V24
pes%{eØ%} /v ; ! V24
seiso% /v:seis v3 ; ! V24
pääs%{eØ%} /v ; ! V24
<Cons Vow+ [l|r|n] %{eØ%}> /v ; ! V25-27 kuolla, purra, mennä
<Cons* Vow+ (Cons+ Vow+) [Cons+ | ConsGrad] [e|i] l  %{eØ%}> /v ; ! V28
<Cons* Vow+ Cons+ Vow i l %{eØ%}> /v ; ! V29
<[Cons* Vow+]^{2,4} Cons* [o|ö]> haravo-i/v ; ! V30
<[Cons* Vow+]^{1,3} Cons* i> vali-tse/v ; ! V31
juo-kse/v:juo juo-kse/v ; ! V32
pie juo-kse/v ; ! V32
syö juo-kse/v ; ! V32
nä nä-ke/v ; ! V33
te nä-ke/v ; ! V33
<Cons* Vow+ (Cons+ Vow+) [Cons+|ConsGrad] [a|ä|e]> ale-ne/v ; ! V34
<Cons* Vow+ (Cons+ Vow+) [h %{kj%} | l %{kj%} | r %{kj%}] e> ale-ne/v ; ! V34
<Cons* Vow+ [Cons+|ConsGrad] [a|ä]> sala-V/v ; ! V35
<Cons* Vow+ [Cons+|ConsGrad|h %{kj%}|l %{kj%}|r %{kj%}] e> katke-A/v ; ! V36
<Cons* Vow+ [Cons+|ConsGrad] i>    selvi-A/v ; ! V37
<Cons* Vow+ [Cons+|ConsGrad] [o|ö]> koho-A/v ; ! V38
<Cons* Vow+ [Cons+|ConsGrad] [u|y]> halu-A/v ; ! V39
<Cons* Vow+ [Cons+|ConsGrad] [a|ä]> pala-V/v ; ! V40 > V35
<Cons* [a|i|o|u] Cons+> kih-ise/v ; ! V41 kihistä-kihajaa
<Cons* [e|y|ä|ö] Cons+> öl-ise/v ; ! V41 
tai tai-tA/v ; ! V43
tie tai-tA/v ; ! V43

LEXICON Clit
 End;
LEXICON Poss
 Clit;
LEXICON PossObl
:ni Clit;
:si Clit;
:mme Clit;
:nne Clit;
:{V} Clit; ! estä kolmnikertaiset vokaalit
LEXICON v0
 Person;
 neg;
:{C} Clit;
LEXICON v1
:{i} Person;
:{i} neg;
LEXICON v2
:isi Person;
:isi neg;
LEXICON v3
:{nlrs}e Person;
:{nlrs}e neg;
:k{aä}{aä} Clit;
:{dlnrtØ}{C}{aä} neg4pe;
:{Øt}tiin Clit;
:{Øt}t{aä}isi neg4pe;
:{Øt}t{aä}ne neg4pe;
:{Øt}t{aä}k{oö} neg4pe;
% INF1:{dlnrtØ}{aä} Clit;
:{dlnrtØ}{aä}kse PossObl;
:{dlnrtØ}ess{aä} Poss;
:{dlnrtØ}en Clit;
:{Øt}t{aä}ess{aä} Clit;
:{Øt}t{aä}m{aä}n Clit;
:{nlrs}{uy}t Clit;
:{Øt}{tØ}{uy} Clit;
LEXICON v0123
 v0;
 v1;
 v2;
 v3;
LEXICON v012
 v0;
 v1;
 v2;
LEXICON v02
 v0;
 v2;
LEXICON v03
 v0;
 v3;
LEXICON v12
 v1;
 v2;
LEXICON v13
 v1;
 v3;
LEXICON /v
% /v: v0123;
LEXICON lä-hte/v
% lä-hte/v:h{td}{eiØ} v0123;
% lä-hte/v:ks v12;
LEXICON kä-y/v
% kä-y/v:y v03;
% kä-y/v:v v12;
LEXICON haravo-i/v
% haravo-i/v:{iØ} v0123;
% haravo-i/v:its{eØ} v012;
% haravo-i/v:i{nt} v3;
LEXICON vali-tse/v
% vali-tse/v:ts{eØ} v012;
% vali-tse/v:tse v2;
% vali-tse/v:{nt} v3;
LEXICON juo-kse/v
% juo-kse/v:ks{eØ} v012;
% juo-kse/v:s v3;
LEXICON nä-ke/v
% nä-ke/v:k{eØ} v012;
% nä-ke/v:h v3;
LEXICON ale-ne/v
% ale-ne/v:n{eØ} v012;
% ale-ne/v:{nt} v3;
LEXICON sala-V/v
% sala-V/v:{VØ} v02;
% sala-V/v:s v1;
% sala-V/v:{nt} v3;
LEXICON katke-A/v
% katke-A/v:{aä} v02;
% katke-A/v:{VØ} v02;
% katke-A/v:s v1;
% katke-A/v:{nt} v3;
LEXICON selvi-A/v
% selvi-A/v:{aä} v02;
% selvi-A/v:{VØ} v02;
% selvi-A/v:s v1;
% selvi-A/v:{nt} v3;
LEXICON koho-A/v
% koho-A/v:{aä} v02;
% koho-A/v:{VØ} v02;
% koho-A/v:s v1;
% koho-A/v:{nt} v3;
LEXICON halu-A/v
% halu-A/v:{aä} v02;
% halu-A/v:s v1;
% halu-A/v:{nt} v3;
LEXICON pala-V/v
% pala-V/v:{VØ} v02;
% pala-V/v:s v1;
% pala-V/v:{nt} v3;
% pala-V/v:j{aä} v02;
LEXICON kih-ise/v
% kih-ise/v:is{eØ} v012;
% kih-ise/v:is v3;
% kih-ise/v:aj{aØ} v012;
LEXICON öl-ise/v
% öl-ise/v:is{eØ} v012;
% öl-ise/v:is v3;
% öl-ise/v:äj{äØ} v012;
LEXICON rake-ntA/v
% rake-ntA/v:n{tn}{aäeØ} v0;
% rake-ntA/v:n{tn}{aäeØ} v2;
% rake-ntA/v:n{tn}{aäeØ} v3;
% rake-ntA/v:ns v1;
% rake-ntA/v:{nt} v3;
LEXICON neg4pe
 neg;
 4pe;
LEXICON 4pe
:{V}n Clit;
LEXICON Person
:n Clit;
:t Clit;
:{VØ} Clit;
:mme Clit;
:tte Clit;
:v{aä}t Clit;
LEXICON End
 #;
